District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
Act may be cited as the “Association Meeting Flexibility Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 303 of the Condominium Act of 1976, effective March 29, 1977 (D.C.
Law 1-89; D.C. Official Code § 42-1903.03), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b) is amended by repealing paragraph (4).
(b) A new subsection (f) is added to read as follows:
“(f) Notwithstanding any language contained in this act or in the condominium
instruments:
“(1) Meetings of the unit owners’ association, executive board, or committees
may be conducted or attended by telephone conference, video conference, or similar electronic
means. If a meeting is conducted by telephone conference, video conference, or similar
electronic means, the equipment or system used must permit any unit owner in attendance to hear
and be heard by, and to comprehend what is said by, all other unit owners participating in the
meeting. Any unit owner, board member, or committee member attending such meeting shall be
deemed present for quorum purposes.
“(2) A link or instructions on how to access an electronic meeting shall be
included in the notice required under subsection (a) of this section.
“(3) Any matters requiring a vote of the unit owners’ association at an annual or
regular meeting may be set by the executive board for a vote, and a ballot may be delivered with
the notice required under subsection (a) of this section. The executive board may set a reasonable
deadline for a ballot to be returned to the association.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) The executive board may authorize unit owners to submit votes by electronic
transmission up to 7 days before the scheduled date of any meeting of the unit owners, and unit
owners who submit votes during such period shall be deemed to be present and voting in person
at such meeting.”.
Sec. 3. Title 29 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 29-910 is amended by striking the phrase “If authorized by the articles or
bylaws” and inserting the phrase “Regardless of whether remote regular and special meetings of
members are authorized by the articles or bylaws” in its place.
(b) Section 29-1005.06(c) is amended by striking the phrase “Unless the organic rules
otherwise provide, members” and inserting the word “Members” in its place.
(c) Section 29-1005.07(e) is amended by striking the phrase “Unless the organic rules
otherwise provide, members” and inserting the word “Members” in its place.
(d) Section 29-1008.11(b) is amended by striking the phrase “Unless the organic rules
otherwise provide, a” and inserting the word “A” in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3